District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.10

Laundry.

An ALR shall provide an on-site laundry facility for use of staff for residents personal laundry. All laundry shall be processed and handled in a manner to prevent the spread of infection by:

(1)

Separate processing and storage of incontinent items; and

(2)

Sanitizing by hot water and appropriate chemical agents.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1010, 47 DCR 2647